Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 2
Environmental Testing

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

[Reserved.]

Subchapter 2
— Environmental Laboratory Accreditation Program Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-2-201. Title.

This subchapter may be called the “Environmental Laboratory Accreditation Program Act”.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 876, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1993; Acts 2017, No. 244, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Environmental Laboratory Accreditation Program Act” for “State Environmental Laboratory Certification Program Act”.

8-2-202. Purpose.

This subchapter authorizes the Division of Environmental Quality to establish and administer an environmental laboratory accreditation program so that laboratories that submit data and analyses to the division may be accredited by the division as having demonstrated acceptable compliance with laboratory standards so that the validity of scientific data submitted to the division may be further assured.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 876, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1993.1; Acts 1993, No. 322, § 1; 1993, No. 440, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 14; 2017, No. 244, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2440.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “This subchapter authorizes” for “It is the purpose of this subchapter to authorize”, “accreditation” for “certification”, and “accredited by” for “certified by”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” and “division” for “department” three times.

8-2-203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Acceptable results” means results within limits determined on the basis of statistical procedures as prescribed by the Division of Environmental Quality;

“Accreditation” means the process by which the division recognizes a laboratory as meeting certain predetermined qualifications or standards, thereby accrediting the laboratory;

“Analyte” means the characteristics of a laboratory sample determined by an analytical laboratory testing procedure;

“Certificate” means a document issued by the division showing the analytes for which a laboratory has received accreditation;

“Consulting laboratory” means a laboratory that performs analyses for any person other than itself.

“Consulting laboratory” does not include a laboratory that is wholly owned by the person for whom the analyses are performed;

“Evaluation” means a review of the quality control and quality assurance procedures, recordkeeping, reporting procedures, methodology, and analytical techniques of a laboratory for measuring or establishing specific analytes;

“Laboratory” means any facility that performs analyses to determine the chemical, physical, or biological properties of air, water, solid waste, hazardous waste, wastewater, or soil or subsoil materials or that performs any other analyses related to environmental quality evaluations required by the division or which will be submitted to the division.

“Laboratory” does not include evaluations to determine the engineering properties related to soil mechanics;

“Matrix” means the components of a sample other than the one (1) or more analyte of interest.

“Matrix” includes without limitation nonpotable water, soil, or oil;

“Method” means procedures and techniques for performing an activity systematically presented in the order in which the procedures and techniques are to be executed;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, joint-stock company or trust, venture, municipal, state, or federal government or agency, or any other legal entity, however organized; and

“Proficiency test sample” means a sample of composition that is unknown to the laboratory and is provided to test whether the laboratory can produce analytical results within the specified acceptance criteria.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 876, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1993.2; Acts 1993, No. 322, § 2; 1993, No. 440, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, § 15; 2017, No. 244, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2441-2443.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (1); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-2-204. Powers and duties of division and commission.

The Division of Environmental Quality shall have the following powers and duties under this subchapter:

To establish and administer the Environmental Laboratory Accreditation Program for laboratories applying for accreditation by the division;

To enforce the provisions of this subchapter and all laws, rules, and federal regulations relating to the program and to environmental testing;

To issue, deny, revoke, or suspend the accreditation of a laboratory for cause; and

To refuse to accept analytical results from a laboratory when the division reasonably determines that the results do not meet reasonable criteria for validation, regardless of whether the laboratory is accredited.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall have the following powers and duties under this subchapter:

To establish by rule reasonable fees for the accreditation procedures under this subchapter and to cover the expenses of administering the program; and

To promulgate necessary rules to effect the purpose and administration of the program, including without limitation, provisions governing accreditation, modification, and renewal of accreditation and reaccreditation after revocation.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 876, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1993.3; Acts 1993, No. 322, § 3; 1993, No. 440, § 3; 2017, No. 244, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 442, 443; 2019, No. 910, § 2444.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “accreditation” for “certification” and “accredited” for “certified” throughout; in (a)(1), deleted “State” preceding “Environmental”; substituted “under” for “set forth in” in (b)(1); and, in (b)(2), deleted “as may be” preceding “necessary”, substituted “without limitation, provisions governing” for “but not limited to provisions governing applications for”, substituted “reaccreditation” for “recertification”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “federal” in (a)(2); substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b)(1); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(1) and (a)(4).

8-2-205. Procedure for issuance of rules, appeals, hearings, etc.

Any person that violates any provision of this subchapter or of any rule or order issued pursuant to this subchapter or that commits an unlawful act under this subchapter shall be subject to the same penalty and enforcement provisions as are contained in the Arkansas Water Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq.

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, the procedure of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission for issuance of any rules, conduct of hearings, notice, review of actions on certificates, right of appeal, presumptions, finality of actions, and related matters shall be as provided in Part I of the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, §§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106, 8-4-201 — 8-4-229, including without limitation, §§ 8-4-202, 8-4-205 — 8-4-210, 8-4-212 — 8-4-214, and 8-4-218 — 8-4-229.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 876, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1993.7; Acts 1993, No. 322, § 4; 1993, No. 440, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 444.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to § 1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by identical Acts 1993, Nos. 322 and 440. This section was also amended by identical Acts 1993, Nos. 163 and 165, § 8, to read as follows:

“(a)

The procedure of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission for issuance of any rules and regulations, conduct of hearings, notice, review of actions on certificates, right of appeal, presumptions, finality of actions, and related matters shall be as provided in Part I of the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, as amended, §§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106, 8-4-201 — 8-4-229, including, without limitation, §§ 8-4-202, 8-4-210, 8-4-212 — 8-4-214, 8-4-218 — 8-4-229.

“(b)

Any permittee or person subject to regulation may petition the commission for a declaratory order as to the applicability of any rule, statute, permit, or order enforced by the department or the commission. Such petitions shall be processed in the same manner as appeals under the procedures prescribed by §§ 8-4-205, 8-4-212, and 8-4-218 — 8-4-229. These declaratory orders shall have the same status as an order of the commission.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “or regulations” following “rules” in the section heading; deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

8-2-206. Accreditation — Criteria and procedure.

All consulting laboratories performing analyses for which results are to be submitted to the Division of Environmental Quality shall obtain a laboratory accreditation under this subchapter.

An analyte, method, or matrix for which the Environmental Laboratory Accreditation Program does not provide accreditation shall be evaluated by the division for acceptance.

The division, in its sole discretion, may refuse to accept results of analyses performed by a consulting laboratory that does not hold a laboratory accreditation under the program for the reason that the laboratory is not accredited.

Accreditation for laboratories other than consulting laboratories shall not be mandatory.

Applications for accreditation shall be made in the form and manner established by the division.

Upon receipt of an application for accreditation, the division shall evaluate and act upon the application in accordance with the following procedures and criteria:

The laboratory must successfully complete an evaluation.

The division shall establish evaluation criteria on proper analytical techniques, quality assurance, recordkeeping, and reporting methods and procedures and facilities, equipment, and personnel requirements; and

The laboratory must submit to the division acceptable results from its analysis of proficiency test samples for the specific analytes, methods, and matrices selected for accreditation.

Upon completion of the laboratory evaluation and the review of the proficiency test sample results, the division shall notify the laboratory of its determination to award or deny accreditation.

If the adequacy of the laboratory's capability and its recordkeeping have been sufficiently established to the satisfaction of the division, a certificate will be issued to the laboratory for the evaluated categories of analytes, methods, and matrices.

If accreditation is denied, the division shall set forth, in writing, the reasons for denial.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 876, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1993.4; Acts 1993, No. 322, § 5; 1993, No. 440, § 5; 2017, No. 244, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 2445.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Accreditation” for “Certification” in the section heading, (a)(2), and (b) through (e); redesignated former (a)(1)(A) as present (a)(1)(A)(i) and substituted “accreditation” for “certification”; added (a)(1)(A)(ii); in (a)(1)(B), substituted “a laboratory accreditation under the program” for “a certification pursuant to the program” and “accredited” for “certified”; inserted “techniques” in (c)(1)(B); deleted (c)(2)(B) and (c)(2)(C) and redesignated former (c)(2)(A) as (c)(2); in (c)(2), substituted “proficiency test” for “performance audit” and “analytes, methods, and matrices” for “parameters”; substituted “proficiency test” for “audit” in (d); and, in (e)(1), substituted “recordkeeping” for “adequacy” and “analytes, methods, and matrices” for “parameters”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1)(A)(i); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-2-207. Accreditation — Duration — Renewal.

A certificate of accreditation shall be effective for a period of one (1) year from the date of issuance, after which time the accreditation will lapse.

Accreditation may be renewed for additional periods of one (1) year's duration upon application for renewal made to the Division of Environmental Quality.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 876, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1993.4; Acts 2017, No. 244, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 2446.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Accreditation” for “Certification” in the section heading; in (a), inserted “of accreditation” and substituted “accreditation” for “certificate”; and substituted “Accreditation” for “Certification” in (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b).

8-2-208. Accreditation — Revocation.

After a laboratory is accredited, the laboratory's accreditation may be revoked or suspended by the Division of Environmental Quality for:

Knowingly falsifying any data submitted to the division or any data related to laboratory analysis;

Knowingly making any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document issued by or sent to the division or related to laboratory analysis;

Knowingly misrepresenting procedures or documentation used in sampling or laboratory analysis;

Failing to comply with any one (1) or more of the following requirements under which the accreditation was issued:

Methods or procedures pertaining to analytical techniques, quality assurance, recordkeeping, or reporting methods; or

Facility, equipment, or personnel requirements; or

Failing to achieve acceptable results for specific analytes, methods, or matrices for which it has been accredited.

It shall be unlawful for any person:

To knowingly falsify any data submitted to the division or any data related to laboratory analysis;

To knowingly make any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document issued by or sent to the division or related to laboratory analysis;

To knowingly misrepresent sampling procedures or methods used in laboratory analysis;

To knowingly render inaccurate any accreditation issued under this subchapter; or

To knowingly represent that a person is accredited when that person is not accredited.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 876, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1993.5; Acts 1993, No. 322, § 6; 1993, No. 440, § 6; 2017, No. 244, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2447, 2448.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Accreditation” for “Certification” in the section heading; in the introductory language of (a), substituted “After a laboratory is accredited, the laboratory's accreditation” for “Once certified a laboratory's certification” and added “for”; substituted “Knowingly falsifying” for “For knowing falsification of” in (a)(1);
substituted “Knowingly” for “For knowingly” in (a)(2); substituted “Knowingly misrepresenting” for “For knowing misrepresentation of” in (a)(3); rewrote (a)(4) and (a)(5); substituted “accreditation” for “certification” in (b)(4); and rewrote (b)(5).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1) and (b)(2).

8-2-209. Fees.

The Division of Environmental Quality may assess and collect reasonable fees from participating laboratories for the administrative costs of the Environmental Laboratory Accreditation Program.

The costs shall include without limitation, the expense of conducting evaluations.

Fees may be assessed at the time of initial application, renewal application, application for modification, or at the time a certificate is awarded.

Following a public hearing and based upon a record calculating the reasonable administrative costs of conducting accreditation procedures under this subchapter and costs of enforcing the terms and conditions of accreditations, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may establish reasonable fees for initial issuance, annual review, and modification of accreditations authorized by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 876, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1993.6; Acts 1993, No. 322, § 7; 1993, No. 440, § 7; 2017, No. 244, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 2449.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Accreditation” for “Certification” in (a)(1) and made similar changes throughout (c); in (a)(1), substituted “may assess and collect reasonable fees from” for “shall be authorized to assess reasonable fees to” and deleted “State” preceding “Environmental”; in (a)(2), substituted “shall include without limitation” for “will include, but are not limited to” and deleted “and the procurement of performance audit samples” following “evaluations” at the end; and substituted “under this subchapter” for “set forth herein” in (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1).